Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB144.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 16.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the duty to return confiscated firearms to innocent owners pursuant to
KRS 500.090, and subsection (7) of this section, all firearms confiscated by the
Department of Kentucky State Police and not retained for official use pursuant to
KRS 500.090 shall be[ sold at public auction to]:
(a) Sold at public action to federally licensed firearms dealers holding a license
appropriate for the type of firearm sold; or
(b) For a firearm which was used in a homicide, destroyed[any person who
certifies on a form provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police prior
to placing a bid that he or she will, upon completion of the auction, leave the
firearm with the Department of Kentucky State Police for destruction. A state
or local government or agency thereof shall not purchase a firearm under this
paragraph].
(2) Any provision of KRS Chapter 45 or 45A relating to disposition of property to the
contrary notwithstanding, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall:
(a) Conduct any auction specified by this section;
(b) Retain for departmental use twenty percent (20%) of the gross proceeds from
any auction specified by this section; and
(c) Transfer remaining proceeds of the sale to the account of the Kentucky Office
of Homeland Security for use as provided in subsection (5) of this section[;
and
(d) For any sale pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, destroy the firearm].
(3) Prior to the destruction or sale of any firearm, the Department of Kentucky State
Police shall make an attempt to determine if the firearm to be destroyed or sold has
been stolen or otherwise unlawfully obtained from an innocent owner and return the
Page 1 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
firearm to its lawful innocent owner, unless that person is ineligible to purchase a
firearm under federal law.
(4) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall receive firearms and ammunition
confiscated by or abandoned to every law enforcement agency in Kentucky. The
department shall dispose of the firearms received in the manner specified in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section. However, firearms that[which] are not
retained for official use, returned to an innocent lawful owner, destroyed, or
transferred to another government agency or public museum shall be sold as
provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) The proceeds of firearms sales shall be utilized by the Kentucky Office of
Homeland Security to provide grants to city, county, charter county, unified local
government, urban-county government, and consolidated local government police
departments; university safety and security departments organized pursuant to KRS
164.950; school districts that employ special law enforcement officers as defined in
KRS 61.900; and sheriff's departments for the purchase of:
(a) Body armor for sworn peace officers of those departments and service
animals, as defined in KRS 525.010, of those departments;
(b) Firearms or ammunition;
(c) Electronic control devices, electronic control weapons, or electro-muscular
disruption technology; and
(d) Body-worn cameras.
In awarding grants under this section, the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security
shall give first priority to providing and replacing body armor and second priority to
providing firearms and ammunition, with residual funds available for the purchase
of body-worn cameras, electronic control devices, electronic control weapons, or
electro-muscular disruption technology. Body armor purchased by the department
receiving grant funds shall meet or exceed the standards issued by the National
Page 2 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
Institute of Justice for body armor. No police or sheriff's department shall apply for
a grant to replace existing body armor unless that body armor has been in actual use
for a period of five (5) years or longer. Any department applying for grant funds for
body-worn cameras shall develop a policy for their use and shall submit that policy
with its application for the grant funds to the Office of Homeland Security as part of
the application process.
(6) The Department of Kentucky State Police may transfer a machine gun, short-
barreled shotgun, short-barreled rifle, silencer, pistol with a shoulder stock, any
other weapon, or destructive device as defined by the National Firearms Act in 26
U.S.C. sec. 5845 (f), which is subject to registration under the National Firearms
Act, 26 U.S.C. ch. 53, and is not properly registered in the national firearms transfer
records for those types of weapons, to the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, [and
]Firearms and Explosives of the United States Department of Justice, after a
reasonable attempt has been made to transfer the firearm to an eligible state or local
law enforcement agency or to an eligible museum and no eligible recipient will take
the firearm or weapon. National Firearms Act firearms and weapons which are
properly registered and not returned to an innocent lawful owner or retained for
official use as provided in this section shall be destroyed or sold in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section.
(7) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee may order the destruction of
any firearm confiscated by the Department of Kentucky State Police and not
retained for official use, or any firearm coming into the custody of another law
enforcement agency and transferred to the Department of Kentucky State Police
for disposition as required by Section 2 of this Act, if it is determined that the
firearm:
(a) Has been defaced so as to render illegible the serial number or other
markings required by state or federal law to be placed on such firearm prior
Page 3 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
to its sale by a licensed manufacturer or licensed importer;
(b) Is contaminated with a hazardous substance or biological materials, to an
extent that would make the firearm hazardous to health;
(c) Is unsafe to discharge in the manner for which it was designed, due to
damage or alteration; or
(d) Is subject to return to an innocent owner who has requested, in writing, that
the Department of Kentucky State Police destroy the firearm.
Section 2. KRS 500.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 500.092, all property which is subject to forfeiture
under any section of the Kentucky Penal Code shall be disposed of in accordance
with this section.
(a) Property other than firearms which is forfeited under any section of this code
may, upon order of the trial court, be destroyed by the sheriff of the county in
which the conviction was obtained.
(b) Property other than firearms which is forfeited under any section of this code
may, upon order of the trial court, be sold at public auction. The expenses of
keeping and selling such property and the amount of all valid recorded liens
that are established by intervention as being bona fide shall be paid out of the
proceeds of the sale. The balance shall be paid to:
1. The state, if the property was seized by an agency of the state or peace
officer thereof;
2. The county, if the property was seized by the sheriff or an agency or
peace officer of the county;
3. The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, if the property was
seized by a peace officer of the Department of Fish and Wildlife or was
seized by any other officer for violation of KRS Chapter 150;
4. The city, if the property was seized by the city or by an agency or peace
Page 4 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
officer thereof and the property was delivered to the city property clerk;
5. The city (ninety percent (90%) of the proceeds) and the sheriff (ten
percent (10%) of the proceeds), if the property was seized by the city or
by an agency or peace officer thereof and the property was delivered to
the sheriff or the county police; or
6. The state, if the property was seized by any combination of agencies
listed above.
(c) 1. Subject to the duty to return confiscated firearms and ammunition to
innocent owners pursuant to this section, all firearms and ammunition
confiscated by a state or local law enforcement agency, all firearms
ordered forfeited by a court, and all abandoned firearms and ammunition
coming into the custody of a state or local law enforcement agency and
not retained for official use shall be transferred to the Department of
Kentucky State Police for disposition as provided by KRS 16.220,
except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection.
2. a. The transfer shall occur not more than ninety (90) days after the
abandonment of the firearm or ammunition to the law enforcement
agency or not more than ninety (90) days after its confiscation,
unless a court requires the firearm or ammunition for use as
evidence, in which case it shall be transferred to the Department of
Kentucky State Police not more than ninety (90) days following
the order of forfeiture by the court or after the court returns the
firearm or ammunition from use as evidence.
b. Firearms transferred to the Department of Kentucky State Police
for disposition under this paragraph shall not be intentionally
damaged, modified, or disabled by the agency having custody of
the firearm, prior to the firearm transfer, except as may be
Page 5 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
necessary for forensic testing or examination in the course of
criminal investigation or prosecution or civil proceedings.
3. Prior to the destruction or sale of any firearm or ammunition, the law
enforcement agency shall make a bona fide attempt to determine if the
firearm or ammunition to be destroyed or sold has been stolen or
otherwise unlawfully obtained from an innocent owner and return the
firearm and ammunition to its lawful innocent owner, unless that person
is ineligible to purchase a firearm under federal law.
4. This subsection relating to auction of firearms and ammunition shall not
apply to firearms and ammunition auctioned by the Department of Fish
and Wildlife that may be sold to individual purchasers residing in
Kentucky who are eligible under federal law to purchase firearms and
ammunition of the type auctioned.
(d) 1. Subject to the duty to return confiscated firearms to innocent owners
pursuant to this section, all firearms used in a homicide shall, upon
order of the trial court, be destroyed by the agency having custody of
the firearm.
2. The agency having custody of the firearm shall not retain the firearm
for official use or transfer it to the Department of Kentucky State
Police for disposition. The agency shall destroy the firearm not more
than ninety (90) days after the court orders the destruction.
(e) If property which is forfeited under any section of this code is determined by
the trial court to be worthless, encumbered with liens in excess of its value, or
otherwise a burdensome asset, the court may abandon any interest in such
property. Property which is abandoned pursuant to this section shall be
returned to the lawful claimant upon payment of expenses for keeping the
property.
Page 6 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
(f)[(e)] Property which is forfeited under any section of this code may, upon
order of the trial court, be retained for official use in the following manner.
Property which has been seized by an agency of the state may be retained for
official state use. Property which has been seized by an agency of county,
city, or urban-county government may be retained for official use by the
government whose agency seized the property or for official state use.
Property seized by any other unit of government may be retained only for
official state use. The expenses for keeping and transferring such property
shall be paid by the unit of government by which the property is retained.
(2) Money which has been obtained or conferred in violation of any section of this code
shall, upon conviction, be forfeited for the use of the state. This subsection shall not
apply when, during the course of the proceeding in which the conviction is
obtained, the person from whom said money was unlawfully acquired is identified.
(3) Property forfeited under any section of this code shall be disposed of in accordance
with this section only after being advertised pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. This
subsection shall not apply to property which is designed and suitable only for
criminal use or to money forfeited under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The trial court shall remit the forfeiture of property when the lawful claimant:
(a) Asserts his or her claim before disposition of the property pursuant to this
section;
(b) Establishes his or her legal interest in the property; and
(c) Establishes that the unlawful use of the property was without his or her
knowledge and consent. This subsection shall not apply to a lienholder of
record when the trial court elects to dispose of the property pursuant to
subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "lawful claimant" means owner or lienholder of record.
(6) Before property which has had its identity obscured in violation of KRS 514.120
Page 7 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
may be sold or retained for official use as provided in this section, the court shall
cause a serial or other identifying number to be placed thereon, and a record of the
number assigned shall be placed in the court order authorizing the sale or retention
of the property. This number shall be assigned, whenever applicable, in consultation
with the Department of Kentucky State Police and any other state or federal
regulatory agency. The purchaser of the property shall be given a document stating
that the property had been forfeited pursuant to law and that a number, shown on
the document, has been assigned which shall be deemed as compliance of the owner
with KRS 514.120. When property is returned to an owner pursuant to this section
and its identity has been obscured by another person in violation of KRS 514.120,
the court shall provide a document to the owner relieving him or her of liability for
its continued possession. This document shall serve as evidence of compliance with
KRS 514.120 by the owner or any person to whom he or she lawfully disposes of
the property. This section shall not apply to any person after property has been sold
or returned in compliance with this section who violates the provisions of KRS
514.120 with respect to that property.
(7) Before forfeiture of any property under this section, it shall be the duty of the trial
court to determine if a lawful owner or claimant to the property has been identified
or is identifiable. If a lawful owner or claimant has been identified or is identifiable,
the court shall notify the owner or claimant that the property is being held and
specify a reasonable period of time during which the claim may be made or may, in
lieu thereof, order the return of the property to the lawful owner or claimant. If the
lawful owner or claimant does not assert his or her claim to the property after
notification or if he or she renounces his or her claim to the property, the property
shall be disposed of as provided in this section. It shall be the duty of all peace
officers and other public officers or officials having knowledge of the lawful owner
or claimant of property subject to forfeiture to report the same to the trial court
Page 8 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
before the act of forfeiture occurs.
Section 3. KRS 15.440 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each unit of government that meets the following requirements shall be eligible to
share in the distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program
fund:
(a) Employs one (1) or more police officers;
(b) Pays every police officer at least the minimum federal wage;
(c) Requires all police officers to have, at a minimum, a high school degree, or its
equivalent as determined by the council, except that each police officer
employed prior to the date on which the officer's police department was
included as a participant under KRS 15.410 to 15.510 shall be deemed to have
met the requirements of this subsection;
(d) 1. Requires all police officers to successfully complete a basic training
course of nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours' duration within one (1)
year of the date of employment at a school certified or recognized by the
council, which may provide a different number of hours of instruction as
established in this paragraph, except that each police officer employed
prior to the date on which the officer's police department was included
as a participant under KRS 15.410 to 15.510 shall be deemed to have
met the requirements of this subsection.
2. As the exclusive method by which the number of hours required for
basic training courses shall be modified from that which is specifically
established by this paragraph, the council may, by the promulgation of
administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS
Chapter 13A, explicitly set the exact number of hours for basic training
at a number different from nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours based
upon a training curriculum approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Page 9 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
Council as determined by a validated job task analysis.
3. If the council sets an exact number of hours different from nine hundred
twenty-eight (928) in an administrative regulation as provided by this
paragraph, it shall not further change the number of hours required for
basic training without promulgating administrative regulations in
accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.
4. Nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted to prevent the council,
pursuant to its authority under KRS 15.330, from approving training
schools with a curriculum requiring attendance of a number of hours
that exceeds nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours or the number of
hours established in an administrative regulation as provided by
subparagraphs 2. and 3. of this paragraph. However, the training
programs and schools for the basic training of law enforcement
personnel conducted by the department pursuant to KRS 15A.070 shall
not contain a curriculum that requires attendance of a number of hours
for basic training that is different from nine hundred twenty-eight (928)
hours or the number of hours established in an administrative regulation
promulgated by the council pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter
13A as provided by subparagraphs 2. and 3. of this paragraph.
5. KRS 15.400 and 15.404(1) and subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this paragraph
to the contrary notwithstanding, the council may, through the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A, approve basic training credit for:
a. Years of service credit as a law enforcement officer with previous
service in another state; and
b. Basic training completed in another state.
6. KRS 15.400 and 15.404(1) and subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this paragraph
Page 10 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
to the contrary notwithstanding, the council may, through the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A, approve basic training credit for:
a. Completion of eight hundred forty-eight (848) hours of training at
a school established pursuant to KRS 15A.070;
b. A minimum of fifteen (15) years of experience as a certified law
enforcement instructor at a school established pursuant to KRS
15A.070;
c. Completion of an average of forty (40) hours of Kentucky Law
Enforcement Council approved in-service training annually from
January 1, 1997, through January 1, 2020;
d. Three (3) years of active, full-time service as a:
i. City, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated
local, or unified local government police officer;
ii. Sheriff's deputy, excluding special deputies appointed under
KRS 70.045;
iii. Department of Kentucky State Police officer; or
iv. Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources game
warden exercising peace officer powers under KRS 150.090;
and
e. Completion of the:
i. Twenty-four (24) hour legal update Penal Code course;
ii. Sixteen (16) hour legal update constitutional procedure
course; and
iii. Forty (40) hour basic officer skills course within one (1) year
prior to applying for certification;
(e) Requires all police officers to successfully complete each calendar year an in-
Page 11 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
service training course, appropriate to the officer's rank and responsibility and
the size and location of the officer's police department, of forty (40) hours'
duration, at a school certified or recognized by the council which may include
a four (4) hour course which meets the requirements of paragraph (j) of this
subsection. This in-service training requirement shall be waived for the period
of time that a peace officer is serving on active duty in the United States
Armed Forces. This waiver shall be retroactive for peace officers from the
date of September 11, 2001;
(f) Complies with all provisions of law applicable to police officers or police
departments, including transmission of data to the centralized criminal history
record information system as required by KRS 17.150 and transmission of
reports as required by KRS 15.391;
(g) Complies with all rules and regulations, appropriate to the size and location of
the police department issued by the cabinet to facilitate the administration of
the fund and further the purposes of KRS 15.410 to 15.510;
(h) Possesses a written policy and procedures manual related to domestic violence
for law enforcement agencies that has been approved by the cabinet. The
policy shall comply with the provisions of KRS 403.715 to 403.785. The
policy shall include a purpose statement; definitions; supervisory
responsibilities; procedures for twenty-four (24) hour access to protective
orders; procedures for enforcement of court orders or relief when protective
orders are violated; procedures for timely and contemporaneous reporting of
adult abuse and domestic violence to the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services, Department for Community Based Services; victim rights,
assistance, and service responsibilities; and duties related to timely
completion of records;
(i) Possesses by January 1, 2023, a written policy and procedures manual related
Page 12 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
to sexual assault examinations that meets the standards provided by, and has
been approved by, the cabinet, and which includes:
1. A requirement that evidence collected as a result of an examination
performed under KRS 216B.400 be taken into custody within five (5)
days of notice from the collecting facility that the evidence is available
for retrieval;
2. A requirement that evidence received from a collecting facility relating
to an incident which occurred outside the jurisdiction of the police
department be transmitted to a police department with jurisdiction
within ten (10) days of its receipt by the police department;
3. A requirement that all evidence retrieved from a collecting facility under
this paragraph be transmitted to the Department of Kentucky State
Police forensic laboratory within thirty (30) days of its receipt by the
police department;
4. A requirement that a suspect standard, if available, be transmitted to the
Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory with the
evidence received from a collecting facility;
5. A process for notifying the victim from whom the evidence was
collected of the progress of the testing, whether the testing resulted in a
match to other DNA samples, and if the evidence is to be destroyed. The
policy may include provisions for delaying notice until a suspect is
apprehended or the office of the Commonwealth's attorney consents to
the notification, but shall not automatically require the disclosure of the
identity of any person to whom the evidence matched; and
6. A requirement that DNA samples collected as a result of an examination
performed under KRS 216B.400 that are voluntarily submitted solely for
elimination purposes shall not be checked against any DNA index,
Page 13 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1538
retained, or included in any DNA index;[ and]
(j) Possesses by January 1, 2026, a written policy and procedures manual
related to destruction of firearms used in homicides, which includes a
requirement that all firearms used in a homicide are destroyed in a manner
which deems the firearm inoperable and disposed of in a manner so that no
parts of the firearm are functional; and
(k) Requires all police officers to successfully complete by December 31, 2022,
and every two (2) years thereafter, a training course certified by the council of
not less than four (4) hours in emergency vehicle operation.
(2) A unit of government which meets the criteria of this section shall be eligible to
continue sharing in the distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation
Program fund only if the police department of the unit of government remains in
compliance with the requirements of this section.
(3) Deputies employed by a sheriff's office shall be eligible to participate in the
distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund
regardless of participation by the sheriff.
(4) Failure to meet a deadline established in a policy adopted pursuant to subsection
(1)(i) of this section for the retrieval or submission of evidence shall not be a basis
for a dismissal of a criminal action or a bar to the admissibility of the evidence in a
criminal action.
Page 14 of 14
BR153800.100 - 1538 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:25 PM Jacketed